Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 12 Local Officers And Employees — Miscellaneous Provisions
24-12-123. Mayors of cities of the first class.

In all cities of the first class in this state, any person who shall serve as mayor of the city for a period of not less than ten (10) years, upon reaching age sixty (60), or any person who shall serve as mayor of the city for a period of not less than twenty (20) years, without regard to age, shall be entitled to retire at an annual retirement benefit during the remainder of the person's natural life, payable at the rate of one-half (½) of the person's mayoral salary at the completion of his or her last term as mayor.

The governing body of the city may provide by ordinance that any person who has served as mayor for a period of not less than ten (10) years may retire upon reaching age fifty-five (55) with the benefits provided under this section.

The retirement payments shall be paid monthly and shall be paid from the city general fund.

However, a mayor who has served as an elected official or employee of that city prior to or after the person's service as mayor shall count his or her service as an elected official or employee of that city towards the mayor's retirement as follows:

At the rate of one (1) year of a mayor's retirement for each two (2) years served as an elected official or an employee of that city up to a maximum of an additional two (2) years' credit towards a mayor's retirement benefit;

If authorized by a city ordinance, at the rate of one (1) year of a mayor's retirement benefit for each two (2) years served as an elected official or an employee of that city up to a maximum of three (3) additional years' credit towards a mayor's retirement benefit if the person has not fewer than twenty (20) years of mayor's credit and is at least fifty-two (52) years of age; or

If authorized by a city ordinance, at the rate of one (1) year of a mayor's retirement benefit for each two (2) years served as an elected official or an employee of that city up to a maximum of four (4) additional years' credit towards a mayor's retirement benefit if the person has not fewer than twenty (20) years of mayor's credit and is at least fifty-four (54) years of age; and

Service as an elected official or as an employee of the city that is also covered under another retirement plan offered by the city or that is covered by another benefit provided for by law shall not be applied towards the mayor's retirement benefits provided for under this section.

The minimum retirement benefits shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per month for both salaried and nonsalaried mayors.

On January 1 of each year, if a retiree under this section has been retired for at least twelve (12) full months, a cost-of-living increase of up to three percent (3%) will be added.

Subdivision (a)(5) of this section applies only if approved by the governing body of the city.

On the death of any mayor retired under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section or any other acts of the General Assembly, or any mayor who dies in office after becoming eligible to retire under subsection (a) of this section or any other acts of the General Assembly, the spouse of the mayor married to the mayor for ten (10) years or longer may, at the option of the governing body of the city, receive one-half (½) of the retirement benefit the retired mayor was receiving or one-half (½) of the retirement benefit the mayor who died in office was entitled to receive.

However, upon remarriage of the spouse, the benefits shall cease.

The provisions of this subsection are retroactive to November 1, 1983, at the sole discretion of the governing body of the city.

Any mayor retired prior to July 20, 1987, and receiving benefits under prior acts of the General Assembly shall be entitled to continue receiving benefits under the prior acts.

By January 31 of each year in which a petition for election to the office of mayor may be filed, the governing body of the city may by ordinance vote to decrease a benefit available under this section if:

An actuarial study supports the need to lower a benefit available under this section;

The actuarial study supporting the need to lower a benefit available under this section is attached as an exhibit to the ordinance;

The benefit available under this section is not decreased to an amount that is less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250);

The ordinance does not apply to a person who:

Serves as mayor before December 31, 2022;

Served or is serving as mayor at the time an ordinance decreasing a benefit available under this section is effective; or

Filed or has filed for election to the office of mayor at the time an ordinance decreasing a benefit available under this section is effective; and

The decrease of a benefit available under this section does not apply retroactively.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 414, §§ 1-3; 1997, No. 212, § 1; 2001, No. 1615, § 1; 2001, No. 1700, § 1; 2007, No. 293, § 2; 2019, No. 948, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Former § 24-12-123, concerning retirement of mayors of cities of the first class, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 414, § 4. The former section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 305, §§ 1-3.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “person's mayoral salary at the completion of his or her last term as mayor” for “salary payable to the mayor at the time of retirement” in (a)(1)(A); and added (d).

24-12-124. Mayors of cities of the second class.

A person who has served as mayor of a city of the second class for at least twenty (20) years may retire at any age, and a person who has served as a mayor of a city of the second class for at least sixteen (16) years may retire upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age.

On January 1 of each year, if a retiree under this section has been retired for at least twelve (12) full months, up to a three percent (3%) cost-of-living increase will be added.

Subdivision (a)(2) of this section applies only if approved by the governing body of the city.

The governing body of a city of the second class may prescribe the retirement benefits of a person who has served as mayor of the city of the second class and meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

Any mayor who retired before March 18, 1985, and received benefits under prior acts of the General Assembly shall be entitled to continue receiving benefits under the prior acts.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 388, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1115, 19-1116; Acts 2007, No. 293, § 3; 2009, No. 144, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b) and redesignated the following subsection accordingly.

24-12-125. Treasurers of cities of the first class.

Upon approval of the governing body of any city of the first class, any person who has served as city treasurer of the city for a period of fifteen (15) years and who shall retire from office or be succeeded by another city treasurer shall, upon reaching sixty (60) years of age, receive for the remainder of his or her life the retirement pay provided for in this section.

Any city treasurer who shall retire or be succeeded by another city treasurer within the provisions of this section shall be paid monthly a sum equal to one-half (½) of the monthly salary received by him or her during the last preceding year of his or her service.

Upon approval by the governing body of the city, the retirement pay shall be paid by the city from its general fund account.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 349, §§ 1, 2; 1973, No. 119, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1036, 19-1037.

24-12-126. Participation in Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System by certain city or utility managers.

The city or utility manager of any municipality in this state having a city manager form of government and a population of fewer than fifty thousand (50,000) inhabitants, according to the most recent federal decennial census, at his or her option may be included in or excluded from membership in the Municipal Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

If any such city or utility manager shall elect not to be covered by the Municipal Division, a statement in writing to that effect shall be filed with the city manager board of the city, and a copy thereof shall be furnished to the Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 596, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-739.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Municipal Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Cross References.

Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, § 24-4-101 et seq.

24-12-127. Recorder-treasurers and city treasurers of the second class.

Any recorder-treasurers and city treasurers in a city of the second class who shall have served as recorder-treasurer and city treasurer for a period of not less than ten (10) years, upon reaching the age of sixty (60), or who shall serve twenty (20) years without regard to age, may, upon a vote of approval by the governing body of the city, retire from office for the remainder of his or her life at the retirement pay provided for in this section.

On January 1 of each year, if a retiree under this section has been retired for at least twelve (12) full months, up to a three percent (3%) cost-of-living increase will be added.

Subdivision (a)(2) of this section applies only if approved by the governing body of the city.

Any recorder-treasurer or city treasurer or any person serving as recorder-treasurer or city treasurer who shall retire or be succeeded by another recorder-treasurer or city treasurer within the provisions of this section shall be paid monthly a sum equal to one-half (½) of the monthly salary received by him or her during the last preceding year of his or her service.

The retirement pay shall be paid by the city from its general fund account.

Upon the death of any recorder-treasurer or treasurer who retired under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section or any other state statute or any recorder-treasurer or treasurer who dies in office after becoming eligible to retire under subsection (a) of this section or any other state statute, the legally recognized spouse of the recorder-treasurer or treasurer married to the recorder-treasurer or treasurer for ten (10) years or longer may receive, at the option of the governing body of the city, one-half (½) of the retirement benefit the retired recorder-treasurer or treasurer was receiving or one-half (½) of the retirement benefit the recorder-treasurer or treasurer who died in office was entitled to receive.

Upon remarriage of the spouse, the benefits shall cease.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 987, § 1; 2007, No. 158, § 2; 2007, No. 293, § 4.

24-12-128. County officials and employees.

When any county official or county employee retires and either is age fifty-five (55) or older and vested in the County Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or has thirty (30) or more years of actual service or thirty-five (35) years of credited service in the County Division regardless of age, the official or employee may continue to participate in the county healthcare plan as long as the official or employee pays both employer and employee contributions to the healthcare plan.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 745, § 1; 1997, No. 822, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The County Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Cross References.

Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, § 24-4-101 et seq.

24-12-129. Municipal officials and employees.

When any municipal official or municipal employee age fifty-five (55) or over who has completed twenty (20) years of service to the municipality and who is vested in the retirement system retires, the official or employee may continue to participate in the municipality's healthcare plan, receiving the same medical benefits and paying the same premium as active employees as long as the retired official or employee pays both employer and employee contributions to the healthcare plan.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 664, § 1; 1997, No. 1098, § 1.

24-12-130. Limitation on benefits provided by Acts 1997, No. 1098.

Nothing contained in § 24-12-129 should be interpreted to prevent a municipality from providing benefits contained in § 24-12-129 to retirees who are less than age fifty-five (55) or who have completed fewer than twenty (20) years of municipal service. Further, any person who qualified and participated in a municipal health care plan under § 24-12-129 shall continue to be eligible to participate in the health care plan after August 1, 1997.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1098, § 2; 2001, No. 241, § 1.

24-12-131. Monthly benefit increase.

Any former mayor of a municipality having a population of not fewer than twenty-one thousand eight hundred (21,800) nor more than twenty-two thousand eight hundred (22,800) according to the 1990 Federal Decennial Census who is receiving a monthly retirement annuity of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) from a municipality shall receive an increase to three hundred dollars ($300) per month effective July 1, 1999. Thereafter, the municipality shall redetermine the amount of the monthly benefit each January 1. The redetermined amount shall be payable for the following twelve (12) calendar months. The redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding December 1 increased by three percent (3%).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 6.

24-12-132. Health benefits for retired municipal employees and officials.

A retired employee or official may participate in the healthcare plan of the municipality from which he or she retired if he or she:

Is receiving a retirement benefit from the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, or a local pension fund;

Pays both the employer and the employee contribution to the healthcare plan;

Is not covered at any time during retirement by another healthcare plan; and

Notifies his or her employer within thirty (30) days after the official date of retirement of his or her intent to participate in the healthcare plan of the municipality.

A retired employee or official who participates in a municipality's healthcare plan under subsection (a) of this section may include his or her dependents in the retiree's healthcare plan if the retired employee or official pays both the employer and employee contribution to the healthcare plan for his or her dependents.

Each municipality may choose to pay any portion of the employer and employee contributions to the municipality's healthcare plan so long as each retired official and each retired employee of the municipality from which he or she retired is treated equally with regard to the dollar amounts that are paid by the municipality toward healthcare coverage of each retiree.

The retired municipal official or retired municipal employee shall pay the amount of the healthcare premium that is not paid by the employer.

Each municipality shall by policy or ordinance establish the criteria for eligibility as a retiree under this section.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1279, § 1.

Subchapter 2
— Investment Advisor to Invest Plan Assets

Effective Dates.

Acts 1999, No. 50, § 8: Feb. 11, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law pertaining to non-uniform employees pension and relief plans passed in 1949 is limited to cities which did not have pension and relief plans in place in 1949, and who subsequently passed millages to fund such plans. Cities since that time have instituted defined benefit plans and, more recently, defined contribution plans, in which employer and employee contributions, not milages, fund the plans. This Act authorizes cities with non-uniform employee pension plan funds in excess of $100,000, regardless of the method of funding the plans, to update their investment policies and rules consistent with the investment policies and rules enacted in Act 1194 of 1997 for state retirement systems. Such clarification should go into effect immediately in order for cities to take advantage, should they so choose, of the current favorable investment climate and strong economy to increase plan assets, to compete with private industry retirement benefits for qualified employees, and to increase the likelihood of employees retiring with adequate funds for their retirement years. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 332, § 8: Feb. 28, 1999. Became law without Governor's signature. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the present law pertaining to non-uniform employee pension and relief plans passed in 1949 is limited to cities which did not have pension and relief plans in place in 1949, and who subsequently passed millages to fund such plans. Cities since that time have instituted defined benefit plans and more recently, defined contribution plans, in which employer and employee contributions, not millages, fund the plans. This act authorizes cities with non-uniform employee pension plan funds in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), regardless of the method of funding the plans, to update their investment policies and rules consistent with the investment policies and rules enacted in Act 1194 of 1997 for state retirement systems. Such clarification should go into effect immediately in order for cities to take advantage, should they so choose, of the current favorable investment climate and strong economy to increase plan assets, to compete with private industry retirement benefits for qualified employees, and to increase the likelihood of employees retiring with adequate funds for their retirement years. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-12-201. Definitions — Power to invest.

For purposes of this subchapter, “city” means a city of the first class, a city of the second class, and an unincorporated town.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a board of trustees of a city nonuniformed employees' pension plan with assets in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall have full power to:

Invest and reinvest the moneys of the plan; and

Hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any of the investments so made and the proceeds of the investments and moneys.

The investments and reinvestments shall only be made in accordance with the prudent investor rule set forth in §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 50, § 1; 1999, No. 332, § 1.

24-12-202. Authority to employ investment advisor — Investment policy.

A board of trustees of a city nonuniformed employees' pension plan with assets in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may employ an investment advisor as its agent to make investment recommendations and to invest the assets pursuant to a written board investment policy, provided that the governing body of the city declares such services professional services under § 19-11-806 [repealed], and subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by law upon investments of state retirement systems as set forth in §§ 24-2-610 — 24-2-619.

The investment policy shall not limit the investments to interest-bearing bonds.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 50, § 2; 1999, No. 332, § 2.

24-12-203. Immunity — Jurisdiction.

Trustees who comply with the requirements of § 24-2-618(a) are not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for the decisions or actions of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting the delegation of a trust function from the trustees of a trust that is subject to the law of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 50, § 3; 1999, No. 332, § 3.

24-12-204. Construction of subchapter.

This act is cumulative to §§ 24-12-101 — 24-12-118 and shall not repeal those sections.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 50, § 4; 1999, No. 332, § 4.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1999, Nos. 50 and 332, codified as §§ 24-12-201 — 24-12-204.